District of Columbia statutes.
42-3102.01

Authority to obtain law enforcement records.

Upon request by the Attorney General for the District of Columbia, the United States Attorney for the District of Columbia may provide information related to a drug-, firearm-, or prostitution-related property that has been obtained from a law enforcement agency.

Mar. 26, 1999, D.C. Law 12-194, § 3a
as added Apr. 4, 2006, D.C. Law 16-81, § 3(c), 53 DCR 1050
Sept. 26, 2012, D.C. Law 19-171, § 100(a), 59 DCR 6190
The 2012 amendment by D.C. Law 19-171 substituted “drug-, firearm-, or prostitution-related” for “drug or prostitution-related.”